Utah statutes.
67-19d-302.   State treasurer to follow "prudent investor" rule -- Standard of care.

(1)  The state treasurer shall invest and manage the trust fund assets as a prudent investor would, by:

(a)  considering the purposes, terms, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust fund; and

(b)  exercising reasonable care, skill, and caution in order to meet the standard of care of a prudent investor.

(2)  In determining whether or not the state treasurer has met the standard of care of a prudent investor, the judge or finder of fact shall:

(a)  consider the state treasurer's actions in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of the investment decision or action, and not by hindsight; and

(b)  evaluate the state treasurer's investment and management decisions respecting individual assets:

(i)  not in isolation, but in the context of a trust fund portfolio as a whole; and

(ii)  as a part of an overall investment strategy that has risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the trust fund.

